Massachusetts, session 194th, H4388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 43 of the acts of 2007 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the city of Boston police department shall waive the maximum age
requirement for original appointment of police officers for Angela C. Depina. If Angela C.
Depina meets all other requirements set forth by the Boston police department, she shall be
eligible to have her name certified for original appointment to the position of police officer.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1